Illinois, session 104th, HB5110.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Liquor Control Act of 1934 is amended by 5changing Sections 7-1 and 7-6 as follows: 6    (235 ILCS 5/7-1)  (from Ch. 43, par. 145)7    Sec. 7-1. An applicant for a retail license from the State 8Commission shall submit to the State Commission an application 9in writing under oath stating:10        (1) The applicant's name and mailing address;11        (2) The name and address of the applicant's business;12        (3) If applicable, the date of the filing of the 13    "assumed name" of the business with the County Clerk;14        (4) In case of a copartnership, the date of the 15    formation of the partnership; in the case of an Illinois 16    corporation, the date of its incorporation; or in the case 17    of a foreign corporation, the State where it was 18    incorporated and the date of its becoming qualified under 19    the Business Corporation Act of 1983 to transact business 20    in the State of Illinois;21        (5) The number, the date of issuance and the date of 22    expiration of the applicant's current local retail liquor 23    license;  HB5110- 2 -LRB104 19989 RPS 33440 b1        (6) The name of the city, village, or county that 2    issued the local retail liquor license;3        (7) The name and address of the landlord if the 4    premises are leased;5        (8) The date of the applicant's first request for a 6    State liquor license and whether it was granted, denied or 7    withdrawn;8        (9) The address of the applicant when the first 9    application for a State liquor license was made;10        (10) The applicant's current State liquor license 11    number;12        (11) The date the applicant began liquor sales at his 13    place of business;14        (12) The address of the applicant's warehouse if he 15    warehouses liquor;16        (13) The applicant's Retailers' Occupation Tax (ROT) 17    Registration Number;18        (14) The applicant's document locator number on his 19    Federal Special Tax Stamp;20        (15) Whether the applicant is delinquent in the 21    payment of the Retailers' Occupation Tax (Sales Tax), and 22    if so, the reasons therefor;23        (16) Whether the applicant is delinquent under the 24    cash beer law, and if so, the reasons therefor;25        (17) In the case of a retailer, whether he is 26    delinquent under the 30-day credit law, and if so, the   HB5110- 3 -LRB104 19989 RPS 33440 b1    reasons therefor;2        (18) In the case of a distributor, whether he is 3    delinquent under the 15-day credit law, and if so, the 4    reasons therefor;5        (19) Whether the applicant has made an application for 6    a liquor license which has been denied, and if so, the 7    reasons therefor;8        (20) Whether the applicant has ever had any previous 9    liquor license suspended or revoked, and if so, the 10    reasons therefor;11        (21) Whether the applicant has ever been convicted of 12    a gambling offense or felony, and if so, the particulars 13    thereof;14        (22) Whether the applicant possesses a current Federal 15    Wagering Stamp, and if so, the reasons therefor;16        (23) Whether the applicant, or any other person, 17    directly in his place of business is a public official, 18    and if so, the particulars thereof;19        (24) The applicant's name, sex, date of birth, social 20    security number, position and percentage of ownership in 21    the business; and the name, sex, date of birth, social 22    security number, position and percentage of ownership in 23    the business of every sole owner, partner, corporate 24    officer, director, manager and any person who owns 5% or 25    more of the shares of the applicant business entity or 26    parent corporations of the applicant business entity; and  HB5110- 4 -LRB104 19989 RPS 33440 b1        (25) That he has not received or borrowed money or 2    anything else of value, and that he will not receive or 3    borrow money or anything else of value (other than 4    merchandising credit in the ordinary course of business 5    for a period not to exceed 90 days as herein expressly 6    permitted under Section 6-5 hereof), directly or 7    indirectly, from any manufacturer, importing distributor 8    or distributor or from any representative of any such 9    manufacturer, importing distributor or distributor, nor be 10    a party in any way, directly or indirectly, to any 11    violation by a manufacturer, distributor or importing 12    distributor of Section 6-6 of this Act; and .13        (26) The applicant's primary and supplementary 14    electronic mail addresses to which all license-related 15    notices may be served. 16    In addition to any other requirement of this Section, an 17applicant for a special use permit license and a special event 18retailer's license shall also submit (A) proof satisfactory to 19the Commission that the applicant has a resale number issued 20under Section 2c of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act or that 21the applicant is registered under Section 2a of the Retailers' 22Occupation Tax Act, (B) proof satisfactory to the Commission 23that the applicant has a current, valid exemption 24identification number issued under Section 1g of the 25Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and a certification to the 26Commission that the purchase of alcoholic liquors will be a   HB5110- 5 -LRB104 19989 RPS 33440 b1tax-exempt purchase, or (C) a statement that the applicant is 2not registered under Section 2a of the Retailers' Occupation 3Tax Act, does not hold a resale number under Section 2c of the 4Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, and does not hold an exemption 5number under Section 1g of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. 6The applicant shall also submit proof of adequate dram shop 7insurance for the special event prior to being issued a 8license.9    In addition to the foregoing information, such application 10shall contain such other and further information as the State 11Commission and the local commission may, by rule or regulation 12not inconsistent with law, prescribe.13    If the applicant reports a felony conviction as required 14under paragraph (21) of this Section, such conviction may be 15considered by the Commission in accordance with Section 6-2.5 16of this Act in determining qualifications for licensing, but 17shall not operate as a bar to licensing.18    If said application is made in behalf of a partnership, 19firm, association, club or corporation, then the same shall be 20signed by one member of such partnership or the president or 21secretary of such corporation or an authorized agent of said 22partnership or corporation.23    All other applications shall be on forms prescribed by the 24State Commission, and which may exclude any of the above 25requirements which the State Commission rules to be 26inapplicable.  HB5110- 6 -LRB104 19989 RPS 33440 b1(Source: P.A. 100-286, eff. 1-1-18.) 2    (235 ILCS 5/7-6)  (from Ch. 43, par. 150)3    Sec. 7-6. All proceedings for the revocation or suspension 4of licenses of manufacturers, distributors, importing 5distributors, non-resident dealers, foreign importers, 6non-beverage users, railroads, airplanes and boats shall be 7before the State Commission. All such proceedings and all 8proceedings for the revocation or suspension of a retailer's 9license before the State commission shall be in accordance 10with rules and regulations established by it not inconsistent 11with law. However, no such license shall be so revoked or 12suspended except after a hearing by the State commission with 13reasonable notice to the licensee served by electronic or 14other reasonable means registered or certified mail with 15return receipt requested at least 10 days prior to the 16hearings at the last known place of business of the licensee or 17to the licensee's primary or supplemental email address and 18after an opportunity to appear and defend. Such notice shall 19specify the time and place of the hearing, the nature of the 20charges, the specific provisions of the Act and rules 21violated, and the specific facts supporting the charges or 22violation. The findings of the Commission shall be predicated 23upon competent evidence. The revocation of a local license 24shall automatically result in the revocation of a State 25license. Upon notification by the Illinois Department of   HB5110- 7 -LRB104 19989 RPS 33440 b1Revenue, the State Commission, in accordance with Section 23-12, may refuse the issuance or renewal of a license, fine a 3licensee, or suspend or revoke any license issued by the State 4Commission if the licensee or license applicant has violated 5the provisions of Section 3 of the Retailers' Occupation Tax 6Act. All procedures for the suspension or revocation of a 7license, as enumerated above, are applicable to the levying of 8fines for violations of this Act or any rule or regulation 9issued pursuant thereto.10(Source: P.A. 95-331, eff. 8-21-07.)